Illinois, session 104th, HB5595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Line of Duty Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 315/2)  (from Ch. 48, par. 282)7    Sec. 2. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 8requires: 9    (a) "Law enforcement officer" or "officer" means any 10person employed by the State or a local governmental entity as 11a policeman, peace officer, auxiliary policeman or in some 12like position involving the enforcement of the law and 13protection of the public interest at the risk of that person's 14life. This includes supervisors, wardens, superintendents and 15their assistants, guards and keepers, correctional officers, 16youth supervisors, parole agents, aftercare specialists, 17school teachers, and correctional counselors in all facilities 18of both the Department of Corrections and the Department of 19Juvenile Justice, while within the facilities under the 20control of the Department of Corrections or the Department of 21Juvenile Justice or in the act of transporting inmates or 22wards from one location to another or while performing their 23official duties, and all other Department of Corrections or   HB5595 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1Department of Juvenile Justice employees who have daily 2contact with inmates. For the purposes of this Act, "law 3enforcement officer" or "officer" also means a probation 4officer, as defined in Section 9b of the Probation and 5Probation Officers Act. 6    The death of the foregoing employees of the Department of 7Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice in order to 8be included herein must be by the direct or indirect willful 9act of an inmate, ward, work-releasee, parolee, aftercare 10releasee, parole violator, aftercare release violator, person 11under conditional release, or any person sentenced or 12committed, or otherwise subject to confinement in or to the 13Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 14Justice.15    (b) "Fireman" means any person employed by the State or a 16local governmental entity as, or otherwise serving as, a 17member or officer of a fire department either for the purpose 18of the prevention or control of fire or the underwater 19recovery of drowning victims, including volunteer firemen.20    (c) "Local governmental entity" includes counties, 21municipalities, and municipal corporations.22    (d) "State" means the State of Illinois and its 23departments, divisions, boards, bureaus, commissions, 24authorities, and colleges and universities.25    (e) "Killed in the line of duty" means losing one's life as 26a result of injury received in the active performance of   HB5595 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1duties as a law enforcement officer, civil defense worker, 2civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, or chaplain if 3the death occurs within one year from the date the injury was 4received and if that injury arose from violence or other 5accidental cause. In the case of a State employee, "killed in 6the line of duty" means losing one's life as a result of injury 7received in the active performance of one's duties as a State 8employee, if the death occurs within one year from the date the 9injury was received and if that injury arose from a willful act 10of violence by another State employee committed during such 11other employee's course of employment and after January 1, 121988. The term excludes death resulting from the willful 13misconduct or intoxication of the officer, civil defense 14worker, civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, chaplain, 15or State employee. However, the burden of proof of such 16willful misconduct or intoxication of the officer, civil 17defense worker, civil air patrol member, paramedic, fireman, 18chaplain, or State employee is on the Attorney General. 19Subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (a) with 20respect to inclusion under this Act of Department of 21Corrections and Department of Juvenile Justice employees 22described in that subsection, for the purposes of this Act, 23instances in which a law enforcement officer receives an 24injury in the active performance of duties as a law 25enforcement officer include, but are not limited to, instances 26when:  HB5595 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1        (1) the injury is received as a result of a willful act 2    of violence committed other than by the officer and a 3    relationship exists between the commission of such act and 4    the officer's performance of his duties as a law 5    enforcement officer, whether or not the injury is received 6    while the officer is on duty as a law enforcement officer;7        (2) the injury is received by the officer while the 8    officer is attempting to prevent the commission of a 9    criminal act by another or attempting to apprehend an 10    individual the officer suspects has committed a crime, 11    whether or not the injury is received while the officer is 12    on duty as a law enforcement officer;13        (3) the injury is received by the officer while the 14    officer is traveling to or from his employment as a law 15    enforcement officer or during any meal break, or other 16    break, which takes place during the period in which the 17    officer is on duty as a law enforcement officer.18    In the case of an Armed Forces member, "killed in the line 19of duty" means losing one's life while on active duty in 20connection with the September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks on 21the United States, Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation 22Freedom's Sentinel, Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation New 23Dawn, or Operation Inherent Resolve.24    (f) "Volunteer fireman" means a person having principal 25employment other than as a fireman, but who is carried on the 26rolls of a regularly constituted fire department either for   HB5595 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1the purpose of the prevention or control of fire or the 2underwater recovery of drowning victims, the members of which 3are under the jurisdiction of the corporate authorities of a 4city, village, incorporated town, or fire protection district, 5and includes a volunteer member of a fire department organized 6under the General Not for Profit Corporation Act, which is 7under contract with any city, village, incorporated town, fire 8protection district, or persons residing therein, for fire 9fighting services. "Volunteer fireman" does not mean an 10individual who volunteers assistance without being regularly 11enrolled as a fireman.12    (g) "Civil defense worker" means any person employed by 13the State or a local governmental entity as, or otherwise 14serving as, a member of a civil defense work force, including 15volunteer civil defense work forces engaged in serving the 16public interest during periods of disaster, whether natural or 17man-made.18    (h) "Civil air patrol member" means any person employed by 19the State or a local governmental entity as, or otherwise 20serving as, a member of the organization commonly known as the 21"Civil Air Patrol", including volunteer members of the 22organization commonly known as the "Civil Air Patrol".23    (i) "Paramedic" means an Emergency Medical 24Technician-Paramedic certified by the Illinois Department of 25Public Health under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 26Systems Act, and all other emergency medical personnel   HB5595 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1certified by the Illinois Department of Public Health who are 2members of an organized body or not-for-profit corporation 3under the jurisdiction of a city, village, incorporated town, 4fire protection district, or county, that provides emergency 5medical treatment to persons of a defined geographical area.6    (j) "State employee" means any employee as defined in 7Section 14-103.05 of the Illinois Pension Code.8    (k) "Chaplain" means an individual who:9        (1) is a chaplain of (i) a fire department or (ii) a 10    police department or other agency consisting of law 11    enforcement officers; and12        (2) has been designated a chaplain by (i) the fire 13    department, police department, or other agency or an 14    officer or body having jurisdiction over the department or 15    agency or (ii) a labor organization representing the 16    firemen or law enforcement officers.17    (l) "Armed Forces member" means an Illinois resident who 18is: a member of the Armed Forces of the United States; a member 19of the Illinois National Guard while on active military 20service pursuant to an order of the President of the United 21States; or a member of any reserve component of the Armed 22Forces of the United States while on active military service 23pursuant to an order of the President of the United States.24    (m) "Descendant" has the meaning given to the term "child" 25in Section 7 of the Workers' Compensation Act. 26(Source: P.A. 102-221, eff. 1-1-22; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB5595 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1    Section 10. The Public Safety Employee Benefits Act is 2amended by changing Section 3 and by adding Section 16 as 3follows: 4    (820 ILCS 320/3)5    Sec. 3. Definition. For the purposes of this Act, the term 6"firefighter" includes, without limitation, a licensed 7emergency medical technician (EMT) who is a sworn member of a 8public fire department, a paramedic employed by a unit of 9local government, or an EMT, emergency medical 10technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 11technician (A-EMT) employed by a unit of local government.12    For the purposes of this Act, the term "health insurance 13plan" is limited to the insurance plan options that are 14codified in the employee's collective bargaining agreement. If 15the collective bargaining agreement is silent on plan options, 16the available plans for the employee shall be negotiated with 17the authorized representative and subject to the grievance 18process. 19    For the purposes of this Act, the term "child" has the 20meaning set forth in Section 7 of the Workers' Compensation 21Act.22(Source: P.A. 102-439, eff. 1-1-22.) 23    (820 ILCS 320/16 new)  HB5595 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 15262 RTM 28412 b1    Sec. 16. Non-designated beneficiaries. A child or 2posthumous child of a firefighter, law enforcement, or 3correctional or correctional probation officer shall not be 4denied benefits under this Act on the basis that the child had 5not been born or had not been designated as a beneficiary on 6the date the firefighter, law enforcement, or correctional or 7correctional probation officer was killed. This Section 8applies to actions not brought to final and unappealable 9judgment on or before the effective date of this amendatory 10Act of the 104th General Assembly as well as actions commenced 11on or after its effective date. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.